Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
PART 4 Payment Bonds

13-10-60.
(See Editor’s notes.) Large public works contracts; requirement for payment bonds.

Except as otherwise provided in Title 32, payment bonds shall be required for all state public works construction contracts with an estimated contract amount greater than $100,000.00; provided, however, that the state may require a payment bond for public works construction contracts that are estimated at $100,000.00 or less. No public works construction contract requiring a payment bond shall be valid for any purpose unless the contractor gives such payment bond; provided, however, that in lieu of such payment bond, the state, in its discretion, may accept a cashier’s check, certified check, or cash for the use and protection of all subcontractors and all persons supplying labor, materials, machinery, and equipment in the prosecution of work provided in the contract. The payment bond or other security accepted in lieu of a payment bond shall be in the amount of at least the total amount payable by the terms of the initial contract and shall be increased if requested by the state as the contract amount is increased.

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-60, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Orders 06.11.20.01, 06.29.20.02, 07.15.20.01, 07.31.20.02, 08.15.20.01, and 08.31.20.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders/2020-executive-orders.

13-10-61.
(See Editor’s notes.) Liability of contracting entity for failure to comply with article.

If a payment bond or security deposit is not taken in the manner and form required in this article, the corporation or body for which work is done under the contract shall be liable to all subcontractors and to all persons supplying labor, materials, machinery, or equipment to the contractor or subcontractor thereunder for any loss resulting to them from such failure. No agreement, modification, or change in the contract, change in the work covered by the contract, or extension of time for the completion of the contract shall release the sureties of such payment bond.

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-61, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Orders 06.11.20.01, 06.29.20.02, 07.15.20.01, 07.31.20.02, 08.15.20.01, and 08.31.20.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders/2020-executive-orders.

13-10-62.
(See Editor’s notes.) Notice of commencement.

The contractor furnishing the payment bond or security deposit shall post on the public works construction site and file with the clerk of the superior court in the county in which the site is located a notice of commencement no later than 15 days after the contractor physically commences work on the project and supply a copy of the notice of commencement to any subcontractor, materialman, or person who makes a written request of the contractor. Failure to supply a copy of the notice of commencement within ten calendar days of receipt of the written request from such subcontractor, materialman, or person shall render the provisions of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 13-10-63 inapplicable to such subcontractor, materialman, or person making the request. The notice of commencement shall include:

The name, address, and telephone number of the contractor;

The name and location of the public work being constructed or a general description of the improvement;

The name and address of the state or the agency or authority of the state that is contracting for the public works construction;

The name and address of the surety for the performance and payment bonds, if any; and

The name and address of the holder of the security deposit provided, if any.

The failure to file a notice of commencement shall render the notice to the contractor requirements of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 13-10-63 inapplicable.

The clerk of the superior court shall file the notice of commencement within the records of that office and maintain an index separate from other real estate records or an index with the preliminary notices specified in subsection (a) of Code Section 44-14-361.3. Each such notice of commencement shall be indexed under the name of the state and the name of the contractor as contained in the notice of commencement.

Any person having a direct contractual relationship with a subcontractor but no contractual relationship, express or implied, with the contractor furnishing such payment bond or security deposit on a public works construction project where the contractor has not complied with the notice of commencement requirements shall have the right of action upon the payment bond or security deposit upon giving written notice to the contractor within 90 days from the day on which such person did or performed the last of the labor or furnished the last of the material or machinery or equipment for which such claim is made, stating with substantial accuracy the amount claimed and the name of the party to whom the material was furnished or supplied or for whom the labor was performed or done. The notice to the contractor may be served by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, postage prepaid, duly addressed to the contractor, at any place at which the contractor maintains an office or conducts his or her business or at his or her residence, by depositing such notice in any post office or branch post office or any letter box under the control of the United States Postal Service; alternatively, notice may be served in any manner in which the sheriffs of this state are authorized by law to serve summons or process; and

Any person having a direct contractual relationship with a subcontractor but no contractual relationship, express or implied, with the contractor furnishing such payment bond or security deposit on a public works construction project where the contractor has complied with the notice of commencement requirements in accordance with subsection (a) of Code Section 13-10-62 shall have the right of action on the payment bond or security deposit, provided that such person shall, within 30 days from the filing of the notice of commencement or 30 days following the first delivery of labor, material, machinery, or equipment, whichever is later, give to the contractor a written notice setting forth:

The name, address, and telephone number of the person providing labor, material, machinery, or equipment;

The name and address of each person at whose instance the labor, material, machinery, or equipment is being furnished;

The name and the location of the public works construction site; and

A description of the labor, material, machinery, or equipment being provided and, if known, the contract price or anticipated value of the labor, material, machinery, or equipment to be provided or the amount claimed to be due, if any.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall limit the right of action of a person entitled to the protection of the payment bond or security deposit required to be given pursuant to this article to the 90 day period following the day on which such person did or performed the last of the labor or furnished the last of the material or machinery or equipment for which such claim is made.

Every action instituted under this Code section shall be brought in the name of the claimant without making the state or the agency or authority of the state for which the work was done or was to be done a party to such action.

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-62, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 628, § 3/SB 179.

The 2013 amendment,

effective May 6, 2013, substituted “paragraph (2)” for “paragraph (1)” in subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Orders 06.11.20.01, 06.29.20.02, 07.15.20.01, 07.31.20.02, 08.15.20.01, and 08.31.20.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders/2020-executive-orders.

13-10-63.
(See Editor’s notes.) Pursuit of action by person entitled to protection of payment bond; liability of public entity.

Every person entitled to the protection of the payment bond or security deposit required to be given who has not been paid in full for labor or materials furnished in the prosecution of the work referred to in such bond or security deposit before the expiration of a period of 90 days after the day on which the last of the labor was done or performed by such person or the material or equipment or machinery was furnished or supplied by such person for which such claim is made, or when he or she has completed his or her subcontract for which claim is made, shall have the right to bring an action on such payment bond or security deposit for the amount, or the balance thereof, unpaid at the time of the commencement of such action and to prosecute such action to final execution and judgment for the sum or sums due such person; provided, however, that:

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-63, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Orders 06.11.20.01, 06.29.20.02, 07.15.20.01, 07.31.20.02, 08.15.20.01, and 08.31.20.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders/2020-executive-orders.

13-10-64.
(See Editor’s notes.) Supplying copy of bond or security deposit agreement and contract; fees for certified copies.

The official who has the custody of the bond or security deposit required by this article is authorized and directed to furnish to any person making application therefor a copy of the bond or security deposit agreement and the contract for which it was given, certified by the official who has custody of the bond or security deposit. With his or her application, such person shall also submit an affidavit that he or she has supplied labor or materials for such work and that payment therefor has not been made or that he or she is being sued on any such bond or security deposit. Such copy shall be primary evidence of the bond or security deposit and contract and shall be admitted in evidence without further proof. Applicants shall pay for such certified copies and such certified statements such fees as the official fixes to cover the cost of preparation thereof, provided that in no case shall the fee fixed exceed the fees which the clerks of the superior courts are permitted to charge for similar copies.

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-64, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Orders 06.11.20.01, 06.29.20.02, 07.15.20.01, 07.31.20.02, 08.15.20.01, and 08.31.20.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders/2020-executive-orders.

13-10-65.
(See Editor’s notes.) Time for instituting action.

No action can be instituted on the payment bonds or security deposits after one year from the completion of the contract and the acceptance of the public works construction by the proper public authorities. Every action instituted under this article shall be brought in the name of the claimant, without the state or the agency or authority of the state for which the work was done or was to be done being made a party thereto.

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-65, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Orders 06.11.20.01, 06.29.20.02, 07.15.20.01, 07.31.20.02, 08.15.20.01, and 08.31.20.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders/2020-executive-orders.

13-10-66.
Acceptance of electronic signatures and seals.

Public procurement officers shall accept electronic signatures and electronic corporate seals on bonds issued pursuant to this part so long as such signatures and seals comply with the provisions of Chapter 12 of Title 10 and Code Section 33-24-14.

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-66, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 459, § 1-2/SB 169.